Massachusetts, session 194th, H5569.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding section 1A of chapter 58 of the General Laws or any other
general or special law, rule or regulation to the contrary, the commissioner of revenue shall
further adjust the minimum residential factor of the city of Watertown determined under said
section 1A of said chapter 58 for fiscal year 2027 and subsequent fiscal years if adoption of such
factor for any such year would otherwise have been determined through application of the
percentage limitation under clause (b) of the third sentence of the second paragraph of said
section 1A of said chapter 58. The new minimum residential factor for fiscal year 2027 and
subsequent fiscal years shall be 50 per cent, subject to such adjustment upward as may be
required to provide that the percentage of the total tax levy imposed on any class of real or
personal property shall not exceed 175 per cent of the full and fair cash valuation of the taxable
real and personal property in the city of Watertown, unless otherwise amended by general or
special law, rule or regulation.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1